North Carolina, session 2025, HB1185.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 136-28.12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-28.12. Litter removal coordinated with mowing of highway rights-of-way.
(a) For State-maintained roads, the Department of Transportation shall coordinate litter
removal and mowing as follows:
(1) If the highway right-of-way to be mowed is part of the primary road system,
the Department shall schedule the removal of litter before the right-of-way is
mowed.
(2) If the highway right-of-way to be mowed is part of the secondary road system,
the Department shall schedule, to the extent practicable, the removal of litter
before the right-of-way is mowed.
(3) The Department shall not schedule mowing of highway rights-of-way during
the month of May.May except as provided in this subdivision. Upon request
of a local government in which a sporting event that expects no less than five
thousand (5,000) attendees is scheduled to be held in the month of May, the
Department shall mow highway rights-of-way located within a five (5) mile
radius of the location of the sporting event. A local government shall submit
such a request to the district engineer having jurisdiction no less than thirty
(30) days prior to the date on which the sporting event is scheduled, and the
Department shall mow the rights-of way in the specified radius surrounding
the event not more than seven (7) days and not less than two (2) days prior to
the scheduled date for the event.
(b) The Department shall require as a term of any contract to mow or remove litter that
the contracting party agree to the provisions in subsection (a) of this section."
SECTION 2. The sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) from the General Fund is
appropriated to the North Carolina Department of Transportation in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year for administration and operational costs related to providing mowing
requested by local governments.
*H1185-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 1185-First Edition